District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.12

New highway plans authorized.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized, whenever in his judgment the public interests require it, to prepare a new highway plan for any portion of the District of Columbia, and submit the same for approval, after public hearing, to the National Capital Planning Commission; such highway plans shall be prepared under §§ 9-101.04 to 9-101.06 and 9-103.01 to 9-103.05, and upon approval and recording of any such new highway plan it shall take the place of and stand for any previous plan for the portion of the District of Columbia affected.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 949, ch. 150
1981 Ed., § 7-122.
1973 Ed., § 7-122.
The functions, powers, and duties of the National Capital Park and Planning Commission were transferred to the National Capital Planning Commission by the Act of June 6, 1924, ch. 270, § 9, as added by the Act of July 19, 1952, 66 Stat. 790, ch. 949, § 1.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.